dictsource/ti_rules
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Tigrinya
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// all words lower case

.group 0xe188		// characters U+1200 to U+123f
	ሀ	h@
	ሁ	hu
	ሂ	hi
	ሃ	ha
	ሄ	he
	ህ	hy
     @) ህ (_	x
	ሆ	ho
	
	ለ	l@
	ሉ	lu
	ሊ	li
	ላ	la
	ሌ	le
	ል	ly
     @) ል (_	l
	ሎ	lo
	ሏ	lua

	ሐ	H@
	ሑ	Hu
	ሒ	Hi
	ሓ	Ha
	ሔ	He
	ሕ	Hy
     @) ሕ (_	H
	ሖ	Ho
	ሗ	Hwa

	መ	m@
	ሙ	mu
	ሚ	mi
	ማ	ma
	ሜ	me
	ም	my
     @) ም (_	m
	ሞ	mo
	ሟ	mwa

	ሠ	s@
	ሡ	su
	ሢ	si
	ሣ	sa
	ሤ	se
	ሥ	sy
     @) ሥ (_	s
	ሦ	so
	ሧ	swa

	ረ	r@
	ሩ	ru
	ሪ	ri
	ራ	ra
	ሬ	re
	ር	ry
     @) ር (_	r
	ሮ	ro
	ሯ	rwa

	ሰ	s@
	ሱ	su
	ሲ	si
	ሳ	sa
	ሴ	se
	ስ	sy
     @) ስ (_	s
	ሶ	so
	ሷ	swa

	ሸ	S@
	ሹ	Su
	ሺ	Si
	ሻ	Sa
	ሼ	Se
	ሽ	Sy
     @) ሽ (_	S
	ሾ	So
	ሿ	Swa


.group 0xe189		// U+1240 to U+127F
	ቀ	k`@	// U+1240
	ቁ	k`u
	ቂ	k`i
	ቃ	k`a
	ቄ	k`e
	ቅ	k`y
     @) ቅ (_	k`
	ቆ	k`o

	ቈ	k`w@
	ቊ	k`wi
	ቋ	k`wa
	ቌ	k`we
	ቍ	k`wy
     @) ቍ (_	k`w

	ቐ	K`-@	// U+1250
	ቑ	K`-u
	ቒ	K`-i
	ቓ	K`-a
	ቔ	K`-e
	ቕ	K`-y
     @) ቕ (_	K`
	ቖ	K`-o

	ቘ	K`-w@
	ቚ	K`-wi
	ቛ	K`-wa
	ቜ	K`-we
	ቝ	K`-wy
     @) ቝ (_	K`-w

	በ	b@
	ቡ	bu
	ቢ	bi
	ባ	ba
	ቤ	be
	ብ	by
     @) ብ (_	b
	ቦ	bo
	ቧ	bwa

	ቨ	v@
	ቩ	vu
	ቪ	vi
	ቫ	va
	ቬ	ve
	ቭ	vy
     @) ቭ (_	v
	ቮ	vo
	ቯ	vwa

	ተ	t@
	ቱ	tu
	ቲ	ti
	ታ	ta
	ቴ	te
	ት	ty
     @) ት (_	t
	ቶ	to
	ቷ	twa

	ቸ	tS@
	ቹ	tSu
	ቺ	tSi
	ቻ	tSa
	ቼ	tSe
	ች	tSy
     @) ች (_	tS
	ቾ	tSo
	ቿ	tSwa



.group 0xe18a		// U+1280 to U+12B7
	ኀ	ha
	ኁ	hu
	ኂ	hi
	ኃ	ha
	ኄ	he
	ኅ	hy
     @) ኅ (_	x
	ኆ	ho

	ኈ	hw@
	ኊ	hwi
	ኋ	hwa
	ኌ	hwe
	ኍ	hwy
     @) ኍ (_	hw

	ነ	n@
	ኑ	nu
	ኒ	ni
	ና	na
	ኔ	ne
	ን	ny
     @) ን (_	n
	ኖ	no
	ኗ	nwa

	ኘ	n^@
	ኙ	n^u
	ኚ	n^i
	ኛ	n^a
	ኜ	n^e
	ኝ	n^y
     @) ኝ (_	n^
	ኞ	n^o
	ኟ	n^wa

	አ	?a   // U+12A0
	ኡ	?u
	ኢ	?i
	ኣ	?a
	ኤ	?e
	እ	?y
	ኦ	?o
	ኧ	?@

	ከ	k@	// U+12A8
	ኩ	ku
	ኪ	ki
	ካ	ka
	ኬ	ke
	ክ	ky
     @) ክ (_	k
	ኮ	ko
	
	ኰ	kw@
	ኲ	kwi
	ኳ	kwa
	ኴ	kwe
	ኵ	kwy
     @) ኵ (_	kw
	
	ኸ	X@
	ኹ	Xu
	ኺ	Xi
	ኻ	Xa
	ኼ	Xe
	ኽ	Xy
     @) ኽ (_	X
	ኾ	Xo


.group 0xe18b		// U+12C0 to U+12FF

	ዀ	Xw@
	ዂ	Xwi
	ዃ	Xwa
	ዄ	Xwe
	ዅ	Xwy
     @) ዅ (_	Xw

	ወ	w@
	ዉ	wu
	ዊ	wi
	ዋ	wa
	ዌ	we
	ው	wy
     @) ው (_	w
	ዎ	wo

	ዐ	?A-@
	ዑ	?A-u
	ዒ	?A-i
	ዓ	?A-a
	ዔ	?A-e
	ዕ	?A-y
	ዖ	?A-o

	ዘ	z@
	ዙ	zu
	ዚ	zi
	ዛ	za
	ዜ	ze
	ዝ	zy
     @) ዝ (_	z
	ዞ	zo
	ዟ	zwa

	ዠ	Z@
	ዡ	Zu
	ዢ	Zi
	ዣ	Za
	ዤ	Ze
	ዥ	Zy
     @) ዥ (_	Z
	ዦ	Zo
	ዧ	Zwa

	የ	j@
	ዩ	ju
	ዪ	ji
	ያ	ja
	ዬ	je
	ይ	jy
     @) ይ (_	j
	ዮ	jo

	ደ	d@
	ዱ	du
	ዲ	di
	ዳ	da
	ዴ	de
	ድ	dy
     @) ድ (_	d
	ዶ	do
	ዷ	dwa

	ዸ	dd@  // ??
	ዹ	ddu
	ዺ	ddi
	ዻ	dda
	ዼ	dde
	ዽ	ddy
     @) ዽ (_	dd
	ዾ	ddo
	ዿ	ddwa


.group 0xe18c		// U+1300 to U+133F
	ጀ	dZ@
	ጁ	dZu
	ጂ	dZi
	ጃ	dZa
	ጄ	dZe
	ጅ	dZy
     @) ጅ (_	dZ
	ጆ	dZo
	ጇ	dZwa

	ገ	g@
	ጉ	gu
	ጊ	gi
	ጋ	ga
	ጌ	ge
	ግ	gy
     @) ግ (_	g
	ጎ	go

	ጐ	gw@
	ጒ	gwi
	ጓ	gwa
	ጔ	gwe
	ጕ	gwy
     @) ጕ (_	gw

	ጘ	N@
	ጙ	Nu
	ጚ	Ni
	ጛ	Na
	ጜ	Ne
	ጝ	Ny
     @) ጝ (_	N
	ጞ	No

	ጠ	t`@
	ጡ	t`u
	ጢ	t`i
	ጣ	t`a
	ጤ	t`e
	ጥ	t`y
     @) ጥ (_	t`
	ጦ	t`o
	ጧ	t`wa

	ጨ	tS`@
	ጩ	tS`u
	ጪ	tS`i
	ጫ	tS`a
	ጬ	tS`e
	ጭ	tS`y
     @) ጭ (_	tS`
	ጮ	tS`o
	ጯ	tS`wa

	ጰ	p`@
	ጱ	p`u
	ጲ	p`i
	ጳ	p`a
	ጴ	p`e
	ጵ	p`y
     @) ጵ (_	p`
	ጶ	p`o
	ጷ	p`wa

	ጸ	ts@
	ጹ	tsu
	ጺ	tsi
	ጻ	tsa
	ጼ	tse
	ጽ	tsy
     @) ጽ (_	ts
	ጾ	tso
	ጿ	tswa


.group 0xe18d		// U+1340 to U+137F
	ፀ	ts@
	ፁ	tsu
	ፂ	tsi
	ፃ	tsa
	ፄ	tse
	ፅ	tsy
     @) ፅ (_	ts
	ፆ	tso

	ፈ	f@
	ፉ	fu
	ፊ	fi
	ፋ	fa
	ፌ	fe
	ፍ	fy
     @) ፍ (_	f
	ፎ	fo
	ፏ	fwa

	ፐ	p@	// U+1350
	ፑ	pu
	ፒ	pi
	ፓ	pa
	ፔ	pe
	ፕ	py
     @) ፕ (_	p
	ፖ	po
	ፗ	pwa

	ፘ	rj@
	ፙ	mj@
	ፚ	fj@


.group
	$	dolar
	€	j'u@ro
	£	p'aUnd
	¥	j'@n
